Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.350

Notice to alien property custodian—Duration.

RCW 4.28.330 and 4.28.340 shall remain in force only so long as a state of war shall exist between the United States and the designated enemy country involved in the action or proceeding described in RCW 4.28.330.

[ 1943 c 62 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 254-3.]